Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-143
Hayes.

The county of Hayes is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of township eight, range thirty-one, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, range thirty-five; thence south to the southwest corner of township five, range thirty-five; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, range thirty-one; thence north to the place of beginning.

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 856;

C.S.1922, § 758;

C.S.1929, § 25-145;

R.S.1943, § 22-143.